Utah statutes.
48-2e-1151.   Domestication authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-2e-1151 through 48-2e-1156, a domestic limited partnership may become a foreign limited partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-2e-1151 through 48-2e-1156 applicable to foreign limited partnerships, a foreign limited partnership may become a domestic limited partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation.

(3)  If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the limited partnership as if the domestication were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

